Arkansas, session 2025, SB241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 21-5-214, as amended by Acts 2025, No. 205,
is amended to read as follows:
21-4-214. Catastrophic leave program — Definition.
(a)(1) The Department of Shared Administrative Services shall have
administrative responsibility for developing, implementing, and maintaining
the statewide catastrophic leave bank program.
(2)(A) Each state agency shall participate in a catastrophic
leave bank to be administered by the Office of Personnel Management.
(B) The following governmental entities may establish a
catastrophic leave bank for the governmental entities' employees:
(i) The General Assembly;
(ii) The Bureau of Legislative Research;
(iii) Arkansas Legislative Audit;
*LGL087*
04-03-2025 12:18:38 LGL087

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 H4/3/25 SB241
(iv) The Arkansas Department of Transportation;
(v) The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;
(vi) The Supreme Court;
(vii) The Court of Appeals;
(viii) The Administrative Office of the Courts;
(ix) A constitutional office; and
(x) An institution of higher education.
(b) Accrued annual leave and sick leave of employees may be donated to
a catastrophic leave bank.
(c)(1) Catastrophic leave with pay may be granted to an employee when
the employee is unable to perform his or her duties due to:
(A) a A catastrophic illness, including maternity
purposes.; or
(B) The death of an immediate family member.
(2)(A) As used in this section, "immediate family member" means
the father, mother, sister, brother, husband, wife, child, grandmother,
grandfather, grandchild, in-laws, or any individual acting as parent or
guardian of the employee.
(B) As used in subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section,
"child" means:
(i) A biological child;
(ii) An unborn child;
(iii) A stepchild;
(iv) An adoptive child; or
(v) A child in foster care who has been placed in
the home of the employee.
(d) An employee may be eligible for catastrophic leave when:
(1)(A) The employee has been employed by the state for one (1)
year or more or was previously employed by a public school district or state-
supported institution of higher education for one (1) year or more.
(B) A person who was employed by a public school district
or state-supported institution of higher education for less than one (1) year
also is eligible for catastrophic leave if:
(i) The person's combined years of employment with
the state and with a public school district or state-supported institution of
higher education totals more than one (1) year; and
04-03-2025 12:18:38 LGL087

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 H4/3/25 SB241
(ii) The lapse in the person's employment between the
state and a public school district or state-supported institution of higher
education is less than six (6) months;
(2) The employee is female, and the catastrophic leave is to be
used for maternity purposes after:
(A) The birth of the employee's biological child;
(B) The placement of an adoptive child under one (1) year
of age in the home of the employee; or
(C) The foster placement of an infant under one (1) year
of age;
(3)(A) At the onset of the illness or injury the employee had to
his or her credit at least eighty (80) hours of combined sick and annual
leave and has exhausted all such leave, unless the combined sick and annual
leave requirement is waived under subdivision (d)(3)(B) of this section.
(B) A state agency director or a president of an
institution of higher education may waive the minimum eighty-hour requirement
for combined sick and annual leave if the agency director determines that the
employee warrants eligibility because of extraordinary circumstances under
the standards and guidelines promulgated under subdivision (g)(2) (h)(2) of
this section;
(C)(i) An employee on catastrophic leave for maternity
purposes or for the death of an immediate family member is not required to
exhaust sick or annual leave before being granted catastrophic leave.
(ii) An employee on catastrophic leave for maternity
purposes or for the death of an immediate family member does not accrue any
leave;
(4) An acceptable medical certificate from a the treating
physician or acceptable documentation of the death of an immediate family
member supporting the continued absence is on file; and
(5) The employee has not been disciplined for any leave abuse
during the past year from the time of application.
(e)(1) Up to twelve (12) consecutive weeks of catastrophic leave with
full pay may be granted to an employee for maternity purposes.
(2) The employee shall be eligible for the leave only within the
first twelve (12) weeks after the birth, fostering, or adoption of a child.
(3) After the expiration of the twelve (12) weeks of leave under
04-03-2025 12:18:38 LGL087

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 H4/3/25 SB241
subdivision (e)(1) of this section, maternity leave shall be treated as any
other leave for sickness or disability under § 21-4-209.
(4) Catastrophic leave for maternity purposes shall run
concurrently with the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, Pub. L. No. 103-
3.
(5) The employee shall not be eligible for an additional twelve
(12) weeks of leave for the adoption of a child if the employee took twelve
(12) weeks of leave after the initial foster placement of the same child into
the employee's home.
(f)(1)(A) If the administrator of a catastrophic leave program elects
to grant catastrophic leave to an employee under subsection (c)(1)(B) of this
section, the employee shall be eligible for up to forty (40) hours of
catastrophic leave with pay each calendar year for the death of an immediate
family member.
(B) An employee shall be eligible for leave under
subdivision (f)(1) of this section only within the first four (4) weeks after
the death of an immediate family member.
(C) After the expiration of the forty (40) hours of leave
under subdivision (f)(1) of this section, an employee may use his or her
accrued sick leave for the death of an immediate family member.
(2) Catastrophic leave for the death of an immediate family
member under subdivision (f)(1) of this section shall run concurrently with
leave under the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, Pub. L. No. 103-3, if
applicable.
(3)(A) Unused catastrophic leave granted under this subsection
shall not be carried over to the next calendar year.
(B) Upon termination or retirement, catastrophic leave
granted under this subsection is not compensable to the employee.
(f)(g) If the illness or injury is that of an employee and is covered
by workers' compensation, the compensation based on catastrophic leave when
combined with the weekly workers' compensation benefit received by the
employee shall not exceed the compensation being received by the employee at
the onset of the illness or injury.
(g)(h) The Secretary of the Department of Shared Administrative
Services, or the secretary's designee, shall establish policies and
procedures:
04-03-2025 12:18:38 LGL087

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 H4/3/25 SB241
(1) As deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section; and
(2) To prescribe the standards and guidelines of the
extraordinary circumstances that the state agency director or the president
of an institution of higher education may use to waive the minimum
requirement for combined sick and annual leave.

/s/J. Scott




























04-03-2025 12:18:38 LGL087